nb: Strømdrevet tilbehør til utendørs bruk inkludert: Batterilader; Blåser; Motorsag; Ørepropper; Hekktrimmere; Gressklipper; Sikkerhetsbriller; Trimmer; Annet
lt-LT: Į komplektą įeinantys elektrinės sodo ir daržo technikos priedai: Akumuliatoriaus įkroviklis; Pūstuvas; Grandininis pjūklas; Ausų kištukai; Gyvatvorių žirklės; Vejapjovė; Apsauginiai akiniai; Žirklės; Kita
sv: Tillbehör till utomhusström ingår: Batteriladdare; Blåsare; Motorsåg; Öronproppar; Häcktrimning; Gräsklippare; Skyddsglasögon; Trimmer; Övrigt
ko: 실외용 전원 액세서리 포함: 배터리 충전기; 블로워; 전기톱; 귀마개; 전정기; 잔디깎이; 보호용 안경; 트리머; 기타
da: Udendørs strømtilbehør medfølger: Batterioplader; Blæser; Kædesav; Ørepropper; Hækkeklipper; Plæneklipper; Sikkerhedsbriller; Trimmer; Andet
sk-SK: Vrátane vonkajšieho elektrického príslušenstva: Nabíjačka batérií; Dúchadlo; Motorová píla; Zátky do uší; Nožnice na živý plot; Kosačka na trávu; Ochranné okuliare; Trimmer; Iné
pl: W zestawie akcesoria do zasilania zewnętrznego: Ładowarka akumulatora; Dmuchawa; Piła łańcuchowa; Zatyczki do uszu; Przycinarka do żywopłotu; Kosiarka do trawy; Okulary ochronne; Trymer; Inne
cs: Složení sady multifunkčního zahradního nářadí: Nabíječka baterií; Dmychadlo; Motorová pila; Špunty do uší; Nůžky na živé ploty; Sekačka na trávu; Bezpečnostní brýle; Zastřihovač; Jiné
hu: A kültéri elektromos berendezéshez mellékelt tartozékok: Akkumulátortöltő; Befúvó; Láncfűrész; Füldugók; Sövénynyíró; Fűnyíró; Védőszemüveg; Trimmer; Egyéb
nl: Accessoires voor buitenvoeding inbegrepen: Acculader; Blazer; Kettingzaag; Oordopjes; Heggenschaar; Grasmaaier; Veiligheidsbril; Trimmer; Andere
zh-TW: 包括戶外電源配件: 電池充電器; 鼓風機; 電鋸; 耳塞; 剪枝機; 修草機; 安全護目鏡; 修剪器; 其他
pt-PT: Acessórios de alimentação exterior incluídos: Carregador de bateria; Ventilador; Motosserra; Tampões para os ouvidos; Corta-sebes; Cortador de relva; Óculos de segurança; Aparador; Outro
el: Συμπεριλαμβάνονται ηλεκτρικά αξεσουάρ εξωτερικού χώρου: Φορτιστής μπαταρίας; Φυσητήρας; Αλυσοπρίονο; Ωτοασπίδες; Ψαλίδι θάμνων; Χλοοκοπτικό; Γυαλιά ασφαλείας; Ψαλίδι; Άλλο
fr: Accessoires d’alimentation extérieure inclus: Chargeur de batterie; Ventilateur; Tronçonneuse; Boules Quies; Taille-haies; Tondeuse à gazon; Lunettes de sécurité; Coupeur; Autre
zh-CN: 包括户外动力设备配件: 电池充电器; 吹风机; 电锯; 耳塞; 修剪机; 割草机; 安全眼镜; 修剪器; 其他
th: อุปกรณ์เสริมสำหรับไฟฟ้ากลางแจ้งที่รวมอยู่: ที่ชาร์จแบตเตอรี่; เครื่องเป่าลม; เลื่อยยนต์; ที่อุดหู; ที่ตัดแต่งพุ่มไม้; เครื่องตัดหญ้า; แว่นตานิรภัย; กรรไกรตัดแต่ง; อื่นๆ
ru: Принадлежности для электрооборудования открытого типа в комплекте: Зарядное устройство; Воздуходувка; Бензопила; Беруши; Кусторез; Газонокосилка; Защитные очки; Триммер; Другое
tr: Dış mekan elektrik aksesuarları dahil: Batarya şarj cihazı; Hava üfleyici; Elektrikli testere; Kulak tıkaçları; Çit düzenleyici; Çim biçme makineleri; Emniyet gözlükleri; Düzeltici; Diğer
sl-SI: Priložena dodatki za zunanja električna orodja: Polnilec baterij; Puhalo; Motorna žaga; Čepki za ušesa; Prirezovalnik za živo mejo; Kosilnica; Zaščitna očala; Prirezovalnik; Drugo
de: Inbegriffenes Outdoor-Stromversorgungszubehör: Akkuladegerät; Gebläse; Kettensäge; Ohrstöpsel; Heckenschere; Rasenmäher; Schutzbrille; Trimmer; Sonstiges
bg-BG: Включени аксесоари за захранване на открито: Зарядно устройство за батерии; Вентилатор; Верижен трион; Тапи за уши; Ножица за жив плет; Косачка за трева; Предпазни очила; Тример; Други
en: Outdoor power accessories included: Battery charger; Blower; Chainsaw; Ear plugs; Hedge trimmer; Lawn mower; Safety glasses; Trimmer; Other
vi: Bao gồm phụ kiện điện ngoài trời: Bộ sạc pin; Máy quạt; Máy cưa xích; Nút bịt tai; Máy tỉa hàng rào; Máy xén cỏ; Kính an toàn; Máy tỉa; Khác
fi: Mukana ulkokäyttöisten voimatyökalujen lisätarvikkeet: Akku- ja paristolaturi; Puhallin; Moottorisaha; Korvatulpat; Pensasleikkurit; Ruohonleikkurit; Turvalasit; Trimmeri; Muu
ja: 屋外用電源関連の付属品: 充電器; ブロワー; チェーンソー; 耳栓; ヘッジトリマー; 芝刈り機; 安全メガネ; トリマー; その他
hr-HR: Uključeni dodaci vrtnih alata: Punjač za baterije; Puhač; Motorna pila; Čepići za uši; Škare za živicu; Kosilica za travu; Zaštitne naočale; Trimer; Ostalo
es: Accesorios eléctricos para exteriores incluidos: Cargador de batería; Soplador; Motosierra; Tapones para los oídos; Cortasetos; Cortadora de césped; Gafas de seguridad; Recortadora; Otros
pt-BR: Acessórios de energia externos incluídos: Carregador de bateria; Ventilador; Motosserra; Tampões para os ouvidos; Aparador de cercas; Cortador grama; Óculos de segurança; Aparador; Outro
it: Accessori per le apparecchiature elettriche da esterno inclusi: Caricabatterie; Soffiatore; Motosega; Tappi per le orecchie; Tagliasiepi; Tagliaerba; Occhiali di sicurezza; Rifinitore; Altro
ro-RO: Accesorii echipamente electrice pentru exterior incluse: Încărcător pentru baterie; Suflantă; Ferăstrău cu lanț; Dopuri pentru urechi; Mașină de tuns gard viu; Mașină de tuns iarba; Ochelari de siguranță; Mașină de tuns; Altele